Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.220

Bylaws of association—Nomination of directors by public officials or other directors—Limitation.

The bylaws may provide that one or more directors may be nominated by any public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members. Such directors shall represent primarily the interest of the general public in such associations. The directors so nominated need not be members of the association, but shall have the same powers and rights as other directors. Such directors shall not number more than one-fifth of the entire number of directors.

[ 1959 c 312 s 22.]